District of Columbia statutes.
4-1408

Violations; prosecution.

Any person, firm, corporation, association, or public agency who conducts a child-placing agency without a license as provided for in this chapter or who violates any of the provisions of this subchapter shall, upon conviction, be fined not more than $300 or imprisoned for not more than 90 days, or both. Prosecution for violations of such sections shall be upon information in the Criminal Division of the Superior Court of the District of Columbia by the Corporation Counsel of the District of Columbia. Civil fines, penalties, and fees may be imposed as alternative sanctions for any infraction of the provisions of this chapter, or any rules or regulations issued under the authority of this chapter, pursuant to Chapter 18 of Title 2. Adjudication of any infraction of this chapter shall be pursuant to Chapter 18 of Title 2.

History

Apr. 22, 1944, 58 Stat. 195, ch. 174, § 8
July 8, 1963, 77 Stat. 77, Pub. L. 88-60, § 1
July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 570, Pub. L. 91-358, title I, § 155(a)
Oct. 5, 1985, D.C. Law 6-42, § 444, 32 DCR 4450

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 32-1009.
1973 Ed., § 32-788.